Florida, session 2026, HB543.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
122
123 Section 1. The Department of Transportation and any
124 impacted local government shall increase the minimum perception-
125 reaction time for each steady yellow signal located at an
Page 5 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
126 intersection equipped with a traffic infraction detector by 0.4
127 seconds.
128 Section 2. Subsection (4) of section 311.10, Florida
129 Statutes, is transferred, renumbered as section 311.15, Florida
130 Statutes, and amended to read:
131 311.15 Seaports; cargo facilities; reporting requirements
132 311.10 Strategic Port Investment Initiative.—
133 (1) As used in this section, the term:
134 (a) "Cargo purposes" means any facility, activity,
135 property, energy source, or infrastructure asset that is not
136 intended to facilitate the transport of passengers and includes,
137 but is not limited to, such facilities, activities, properties,
138 energy sources, or infrastructure assets that support spaceport
139 activities.
140 (b) "Commercial space launch industry" means any company
141 substantially engaged in the transport, operation, and recovery
142 of space launch or landing services with active maritime
143 operations.
144 (2) Beginning February 1, 2027, and each February 1
145 thereafter, each seaport located in a county in which real
146 property is designated as spaceport territory under s. 331.304
147 and that uses land, facilities, or infrastructure for the
148 purpose of supporting spacecraft launch and recovery operations
149 must submit a report to the chair of the Space Florida board of
150 directors which describes all measures the seaport has taken to
Page 6 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
151 support the commercial space launch industry. The seaport must
152 post a copy of the report on its website once it has been
153 submitted to the chair of the board.
154 (3)(4) As a condition of receiving a project grant under
155 any program established in this chapter and as a condition of
156 receiving state funds as described in s. 215.31, A seaport that
157 is located in a county in which real property is designated as
158 spaceport territory under s. 331.304 and that uses land,
159 facilities, or infrastructure for the purpose of supporting
160 spacecraft launch and recovery operations must, in any agreement
161 with the Department of Transportation, agree that the seaport
162 may not convert any planned or existing land, facility, or
163 infrastructure that supports cargo purposes to any alternative
164 purpose unless all of the following conditions are met:
165 (a) The governing board of the seaport must provide public
166 notice as provided in s. 50.011 at least 30 days before holding
167 a public meeting on the proposed conversion.
168 (b) Before approving the proposed conversion, the
169 governing board of the seaport must prepare or cause to be
170 prepared a report estimating the impact of the conversion on the
171 cargo operations of the seaport. The report must be prominently
172 posted on the seaport's website at least 30 days before holding
173 a public meeting on the proposed conversion.
174 (c) The conversion must be is approved by a two-thirds
175 vote of by the seaport's governing board of the seaport at a
Page 7 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
176 publicly noticed meeting as a separate line on the agenda and
177 with a reasonable opportunity for public comment., and, if
178 approved,
179 (4) The Legislature must expressly approve approves the
180 use of state funds for any a project that includes the such a
181 conversion of any planned or existing land, facility, or
182 infrastructure that supports cargo purposes to any alternative
183 purpose, whether by a work program amendment or through the
184 General Appropriations Act. As used in this subsection, the term
185 "cargo purposes" includes, but is not limited to, any facility,
186 activity, property, energy source, or infrastructure asset that
187 supports spaceport activities.
188 Section 3. Effective upon this act becoming a law,
189 subsection (38) of section 316.003, Florida Statutes, is amended
190 to read:
191 316.003 Definitions.—The following words and phrases, when
192 used in this chapter, shall have the meanings respectively
193 ascribed to them in this section, except where the context
194 otherwise requires:
195 (38) LOCAL HEARING OFFICER.—The person, designated by a
196 department, county, or municipality that elects to authorize
197 traffic infraction enforcement officers to issue traffic
198 citations under ss. 316.0083(1)(a) and 316.1896(1), who is
199 authorized to conduct hearings related to a notice of violation
200 issued pursuant to s. 316.0083 or s. 316.1896. A The charter
Page 8 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
201 county, noncharter county, or municipality may use its currently
202 appointed code enforcement board or special magistrate to serve
203 as the local hearing officer. Pursuant to s. 316.173, a school
204 district may appoint an attorney who is, and has been for the
205 preceding 5 years, a member in good standing of the Florida Bar
206 to serve as a local hearing officer, or the county in which a
207 school district has entered into an interlocal agreement with a
208 law enforcement agency to issue uniform traffic citations may
209 designate by resolution existing staff to serve as the local
210 hearing officer. The department may enter into an interlocal
211 agreement to use the local hearing officer of a county or
212 municipality. The local hearing officer need not reside in the
213 county or municipality where a violation occurred.
214 Section 4. Paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (9) of
215 section 316.008, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
216 316.008 Powers of local authorities.—
217 (9)(a) A county or municipality may enforce the applicable
218 speed limit on a roadway properly maintained as a school zone
219 pursuant to s. 316.1895:
220 1. Within 30 minutes before through 30 minutes after the
221 start of a regularly scheduled breakfast program;
222 2. Within 30 minutes before through 30 minutes after the
223 start of a regularly scheduled school session;
224 3. During the entirety of a regularly scheduled school
225 session; and
Page 9 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
226 4. Within 30 minutes before through 30 minutes after the
227 end of a regularly scheduled school session
228
229 through the use of a speed detection system for the detection of
230 speed and capturing of photographs or videos for violations in
231 excess of 10 miles per hour over the speed limit in force in the
232 school zone at the time of the violation. A school zone's
233 compliance with s. 316.1895 creates a rebuttable presumption
234 that the school zone is properly maintained. The restricted
235 school zone speed limit may only be enforced through the use of
236 a speed detection system when any flashing beacon used to
237 provide the notice of the restricted school zone speed limit is
238 activated. For speed detection systems installed before July 1,
239 2026, capturing the beacon status photographically, on video, or
240 by other evidence is not required for proof of the beacon status
241 until January 1, 2028. An area maintained as a school zone that
242 has no beacon installed before July 1, 2026, has until January
243 1, 2028, to place and install a beacon and, until a beacon is
244 installed, the county or municipality may provide proof of the
245 restricted school zone speed limit in force at the time of
246 violation without evidence of the beacon status.
247 (b) A county or municipality may place or install, or
248 contract with a vendor to place or install, a speed detection
249 system within a roadway maintained as a school zone as provided
250 in s. 316.1895 to enforce unlawful speed limit violations in the
Page 10 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
251 school zone, as specified in s. 316.1895 s. 316.1895(10) or s.
252 316.183 which are in excess of 10 miles per hour over the school
253 zone speed limit in force at the time of violation, on that
254 roadway. The physical placement of a speed detection system may
255 be outside the boundaries of the school zone but within the
256 roadway maintained as a school zone. Any notice of violation or
257 uniform traffic citation issued using a speed detection system
258 must be based solely on a violation occurring within the
259 boundaries of the school zone and during the times authorized
260 under this subsection.
261 Section 5. Subsection (3) of section 316.0776, Florida
262 Statutes, is amended to read:
263 316.0776 Traffic infraction detectors; speed detection
264 systems; placement and installation.—
265 (3) A speed detection system authorized by s. 316.008(9)
266 may be placed or installed anywhere in an area maintained, as
267 defined in s. 316.1895(3)(d), as a school zone on a state road
268 when permitted by the Department of Transportation and in
269 accordance with placement and installation specifications
270 developed by the Department of Transportation. The speed
271 detection system may be placed or installed anywhere in an area
272 maintained, as defined in s. 316.1895(3)(d), as a school zone on
273 a street or highway under the jurisdiction of a county or a
274 municipality in accordance with placement and installation
275 specifications established by the Department of Transportation.
Page 11 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
276 The placement and installation specifications must allow the
277 placement of a speed detection system or components thereof
278 outside the boundaries of the school zone but within the area
279 maintained as a school zone. The speed detection system may only
280 capture violations occurring within the school zone and during
281 the times authorized under s. 316.008(9), regardless of the
282 placement of the speed detection system or its components The
283 Department of Transportation must establish such placement and
284 installation specifications by December 31, 2023.
285 (a) If a county or municipality places or installs a speed
286 detection system as authorized by s. 316.008(9), the county or
287 municipality must notify the public that a speed detection
288 system may be in use by posting signage indicating photographic
289 or video enforcement of the school zone speed limits. Such
290 signage shall clearly designate the time period during which the
291 school zone speed limits are enforced using a speed detection
292 system and must meet the placement and installation
293 specifications established by the Department of Transportation.
294 For a speed detection system enforcing violations of s. 316.1895
295 or s. 316.183 on a roadway maintained as a school zone, this
296 paragraph governs the signage notifying the public of the use of
297 a speed detection system.
298 (b) If a county or municipality begins a school zone speed
299 detection system program in a county or municipality that has
300 never conducted such a program, the respective county or
Page 12 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
301 municipality must make a public announcement and conduct a
302 public awareness campaign of the proposed use of speed detection
303 systems at least 30 days before commencing enforcement under the
304 speed detection system program and must notify the public of the
305 specific date on which the program will commence. During the 30-
306 day public awareness campaign, only a warning may be issued to
307 the registered owner of a motor vehicle for a violation of s.
308 316.1895 or s. 316.183 enforced by a speed detection system, and
309 liability may not be imposed for the civil penalty under s.
310 318.18(3)(d).
311 (c) A county or municipality that operates one or more
312 school zone speed detection systems must annually report the
313 results of all systems within the county's or municipality's
314 jurisdiction by placing the report required under s.
315 316.1896(16)(a) as a single reporting item on the agenda of a
316 regular or special meeting of the county's or municipality's
317 governing body. Before a county or municipality contracts or
318 renews a contract to place or install a speed detection system
319 in a school zone pursuant to s. 316.008(9), the county or
320 municipality must approve the contract or contract renewal at a
321 regular or special meeting of the county's or municipality's
322 governing body.
323 1. Interested members of the public must be allowed to
324 comment regarding the report, contract, or contract renewal
325 under the county's or municipality's public comment policies or
Page 13 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
326 formats, and the report, contract, or contract renewal may not
327 be considered as part of a consent agenda.
328 2. The report required under this paragraph must include a
329 written summary, which must be read aloud at the regular or
330 special meeting, and the summary must contain, for the same time
331 period pertaining to the annual report to the department under
332 s. 316.1896(16)(a), the number of notices of violation issued,
333 the number that were contested, the number that were upheld, the
334 number that were dismissed, the number that were issued as
335 uniform traffic citations, and the number that were paid and how
336 collected funds were distributed and in what amounts. The county
337 or municipality must report to the department that the county's
338 or municipality's annual report was considered in accordance
339 with this paragraph, including the date of the regular or
340 special meeting at which the annual report was considered.
341 3. The compliance or sufficiency of compliance with this
342 paragraph may not be raised in a proceeding challenging a
343 violation of s. 316.1895 or s. 316.183 enforced by a speed
344 detection system in a school zone.
345 Section 6. Effective October 1, 2026, subsections (3),
346 (4), and (5) of section 316.0777, Florida Statutes, are
347 renumbered as subsections (4), (5), and (6), respectively, and a
348 new subsection (3) and subsection (7) are added to that section
349 to read:
350 316.0777 Automated license plate recognition systems;
Page 14 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
351 installation within rights-of-way of State Highway System and on
352 and within property owned or controlled by private entity;
353 public records exemption.—
354 (3) A private property owner may install an automated
355 license plate recognition system solely for use on and within
356 the property owned or controlled by the property owner. A
357 private property owner that installs or directs the installation
358 of such a system:
359 (a) May not access vehicle registration or title data for
360 vehicles identified by the system, unless the private property
361 owner is acting to the extent permitted by the Driver's Privacy
362 Protection Act, 18 U.S.C. ss. 2721-2725, or for the limited
363 purpose of providing notice to a vehicle owner that he or she
364 failed to pay for parking and that such failure has resulted in
365 a parking charge pursuant to s. 715.075.
366 (b) May not share or sell images, personal identifying
367 information, vehicle identification numbers or license plate
368 numbers, or any data that could be reasonably connected to an
369 individual which is collected or generated by the system,
370 except:
371 1. To the extent required to respond to a lawful request
372 from a criminal justice agency;
373 2. To the extent required to control or enforce access to
374 the property or for parking enforcement; or
375 3. To the extent sharing such information is necessary to
Page 15 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
376 report suspicious activity or suspected criminal activity to a
377 criminal justice agency.
378 4. To the extent permitted by the Driver's Privacy
379 Protection Act, 18 U.S.C. ss. 2721-2725.
380 (c) Must contractually obligate any third party that
381 installs, maintains, or operates the system or receives
382 information pursuant to subparagraph (b)2. to protect the images
383 or data collected or generated by the system from disclosure,
384 including a prohibition on sharing or selling such images or
385 data, except to the extent authorized under paragraph (b).
386 (d) Must implement, and must contractually obligate any
387 third party that installs, maintains, or operates the system or
388 receives information pursuant to subparagraph (b)2. to
389 implement:
390 1. Industry-recognized encryption protocols to ensure that
391 images and associated data collected or generated by the system
392 are encrypted in transmission and at rest.
393 2. An auditable access control system that records access
394 to images and associated data.
395 3. A data retention schedule that provides for deletion of
396 images and data no later than 30 days after the images or data
397 is collected or generated by the system, except to the extent
398 needed to comply with a court order, subpoena, or the appeal
399 process detailed in s. 715.075(1)(c) and (d) or to collect an
400 unpaid invoice for parking enforcement. Records detailing
Page 16 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
401 disclosure logs or transaction information may be retained
402 longer in accordance with federal law.
403 (e) May not offer or provide as payment or other
404 consideration any portion of the proceeds derived from a fine or
405 charge imposed based on images or data collected or generated by
406 the system to any third party that installs, maintains, or
407 operates the system, except to the extent the fine or violation
408 is issued in connection with controlling or enforcing access to
409 such property or for parking enforcement.
410 (7) A person who uses or releases information in violation
411 of this section commits a noncriminal infraction, punishable by
412 a fine not exceeding $2,000.
413 Section 7. Effective upon this act becoming a law,
414 subsection (20) of section 316.173, Florida Statutes, is
415 renumbered as subsection (21), subsections (1) and (4),
416 paragraphs (b) and (c) of subsection (6), paragraph (a) of
417 subsection (17), paragraph (a) of subsection (18), and
418 subsection (19) are amended, and a new subsection (20) is added
419 to that section, to read:
420 316.173 School bus infraction detection systems.—
421 (1)(a) As used in this section, the term "school district"
422 includes only educational institutions governed by:
423 1. Section 4, Art. IX of the State Constitution.
424 2. Section 1002.01(3).
425 3. Section 1002.33.
Page 17 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
426 4. Federally funded Head Start programs.
427 (b) A school district may install and operate a school bus
428 infraction detection system on a school bus for the purpose of
429 enforcing s. 316.172(1)(a) and (b) as provided in and consistent
430 with this section.
431 (c)(b) The school district may contract with a private
432 vendor or manufacturer to install a school bus infraction
433 detection system on any school bus within its fleet, whether
434 owned, contracted, or leased, and for services including, but
435 not limited to, the installation, operation, and maintenance of
436 the system. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a
437 private school bus contractor that provides busing services for
438 a school district may not charge a fee or receive remuneration
439 from a district, or a private vendor or manufacturer of a school
440 bus infraction detection system with respect to installation,
441 operation, or maintenance of a system, and may not unreasonably
442 impede installation, operation, or maintenance of a system if
443 selected by the school district. The school district's decision
444 to install school bus infraction detection systems must be based
445 solely on the need to increase public safety. An individual may
446 not receive a commission from any revenue collected from
447 violations detected through the use of a school bus infraction
448 detection system. A private vendor or manufacturer may not
449 receive a fee or remuneration based upon the number of
450 violations detected through the use of a school bus infraction
Page 18 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
451 detection system. This paragraph may not be construed to
452 prohibit a private vendor or manufacturer from receiving a fixed
453 amount of collected proceeds for service rendered in relation to
454 the installation, operation, or maintenance of school bus
455 infraction detection systems.
456 (d)(c) The school district must ensure that each school
457 bus infraction detection system meets the requirements of
458 subsection (19).
459 (e)(d) The school district must enter into an interlocal
460 agreement with one or more law enforcement agencies authorized
461 to enforce violations of s. 316.172(1)(a) and (b) within the
462 school district which jointly establishes the responsibilities
463 of enforcement and the reimbursement of costs associated with
464 school bus infraction detection systems consistent with this
465 section.
466 (f) Review of information from a school bus infraction
467 detection system by an authorized employee or a designee of the
468 school district or law enforcement agency is not prohibited
469 before issuance of a notice of violation or uniform traffic
470 citation.
471 (4) Within 30 days after an alleged violation of s.
472 316.172(1)(a) or (b) is recorded by a school bus infraction
473 detection system, the school district or the private vendor or
474 manufacturer under paragraph (1)(c) paragraph (1)(b) must submit
475 the following information to a law enforcement agency that has
Page 19 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
476 entered into an interlocal agreement with the school district
477 pursuant to paragraph (1)(e) paragraph (1)(d) and has traffic
478 infraction enforcement jurisdiction at the location where the
479 alleged violation occurred:
480 (a) A copy of the recorded video and images showing the
481 motor vehicle allegedly violating s. 316.172(1)(a) or (b).
482 (b) The motor vehicle's license plate number and the state
483 of issuance of the motor vehicle's license plate.
484 (c) The date, time, and location of the alleged violation.
485 (6)
486 (b) Procedures for an administrative hearing conducted
487 under this subsection are as follows:
488 1. The department shall make available electronically to
489 the school district or its designee or the county a Request for
490 Hearing form to assist each district or county with
491 administering this subsection.
492 2. The school district shall assign existing staff or a
493 designee to serve as the clerk to the local hearing officer. A
494 person, referred to in this paragraph as the petitioner, who
495 elects to request a hearing under this subsection shall be
496 scheduled for a hearing by the clerk to the local hearing
497 officer. The hearing may be conducted either virtually via live
498 video conferencing or in person.
499 3. Within 120 days after receipt of a timely request for a
500 hearing, the law enforcement agency or its designee shall
Page 20 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
501 provide a replica of the notice of violation data to the school
502 district or county by manual or electronic transmission, and
503 thereafter the school district or its designee or the county
504 shall mail a notice of hearing, which shall include a hearing
505 date and may at the discretion of the district or county include
506 virtual and in-person hearing options, to the petitioner by
507 first-class mail. Mailing of the notice of hearing constitutes
508 notification. Upon receipt of the notice of hearing, the
509 petitioner may reschedule the hearing twice once by submitting a
510 written request to the local hearing officer at least 5 calendar
511 days before the day of the originally scheduled hearing. The
512 petitioner may cancel his or her hearing by paying the penalty
513 assessed in the notice of violation.
514 4. All testimony at the hearing shall be under oath. The
515 local hearing officer shall take testimony from a representative
516 of the law enforcement agency and the petitioner, and may take
517 testimony from others. The local hearing officer shall review
518 the video and images recorded by a school bus infraction
519 detection system. Formal rules of evidence do not apply, but due
520 process shall be observed and govern the proceedings.
521 5. At the conclusion of the hearing, the local hearing
522 officer shall determine by a preponderance of the evidence
523 whether a violation has occurred and shall uphold or dismiss the
524 violation. The local hearing officer shall issue a final
525 administrative order including the determination and, if the
Page 21 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
526 notice of violation is upheld, require the petitioner to pay the
527 civil penalty previously assessed in the notice of violation,
528 and shall also require the petitioner to pay costs, not to
529 exceed $250 those established in s. 316.0083(5)(e), to be used
530 by the county for operational costs relating to the hearing
531 process or by the school district for technology and operational
532 costs relating to the hearing process as well as school
533 transportation safety-related initiatives. The final
534 administrative order shall be mailed to the petitioner by first-
535 class mail. Mailing of the final administrative order
536 constitutes notification.
537 6. An aggrieved party may appeal a final administrative
538 order consistent with the process provided in s. 162.11.
539 (c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any
540 hearing for a contested notice of violation, or uniform traffic
541 citation that is pending issuance, that has not occurred been
542 conducted before July 1, 2025, may be conducted or issued
543 pursuant to the procedures in this section subsection within 2
544 years 1 year after such date.
545 (17)(a)1. A school bus infraction detection system may not
546 be used for remote surveillance. The collection of evidence by a
547 school bus infraction detection system to enforce violations of
548 s. 316.172 does not constitute remote surveillance.
549 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, video and
550 images recorded as part of a school bus infraction detection
Page 22 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
551 system may only be used for traffic enforcement and for purposes
552 of determining criminal or civil liability for incidents
553 captured by the school bus infraction detection system
554 incidental to the permissible use of the school bus infraction
555 detection system.
556 3. To the extent practicable, a school bus infraction
557 detection system must use necessary technology to ensure that
558 personal identifying information contained in the video or still
559 images recorded by the system which is not relevant to the
560 alleged violation, including, but not limited to, the identity
561 of the driver and any passenger of a motor vehicle, the interior
562 or contents of a motor vehicle, the identity of an uninvolved
563 person, a number identifying the address of a private residence,
564 and the contents or interior of a private residence, is
565 sufficiently obscured so as not to reveal such personal
566 identifying information.
567 4. A notice of a violation or uniform traffic citation
568 issued under this section may not be dismissed solely because a
569 recorded video or still images reveal personal identifying
570 information as provided in subparagraph 3. as long as a
571 reasonable effort has been made to comply with this subsection.
572 (18)(a) By October 1, 2023, and annually quarterly
573 thereafter, each school district operating a school bus
574 infraction detection system must submit, in consultation with
575 the law enforcement agencies with which it has interlocal
Page 23 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
576 agreements pursuant to this section, a report to the department
577 which details the results of the school bus infraction detection
578 systems in the school district in the preceding state fiscal
579 year quarter. The department shall publish each report on its
580 website. The information from the school districts must be
581 submitted in a form and manner determined by the department,
582 which the department must make available to the school districts
583 by August 1, 2023, and must include at least the following:
584 1. The number of school buses that have a school bus
585 infraction detection system installed, including the date of
586 installation and, if applicable, the date the systems were
587 removed.
588 2. The number of notices of violations issued, the number
589 that were contested, the number that were upheld, the number
590 that were dismissed, the number that were issued as uniform
591 traffic citations, and the number that were paid.
592 3. Data for each infraction to determine locations in need
593 of safety improvements. Such data may include, but is not
594 limited to, global positioning system coordinates of the
595 infraction, the date and time of the infraction, and the name of
596 the school that the school bus was transporting students to or
597 from.
598 4. Any other statistical data and information required by
599 the department to complete the report required by paragraph (c).
600 (19) A school bus infraction detection system must meet
Page 24 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
601 specifications established by the State Board of Education and
602 must be tested at regular intervals according to specifications
603 prescribed by state board rule. The state board must establish
604 such specifications by rule on or before December 31, 2023.
605 However, any such equipment acquired by purchase, lease, or
606 other arrangement under an agreement entered into by a school
607 district on or before December 31, 2023, is not required to meet
608 the specifications established by the state board until July 1,
609 2024. In any proceeding challenging a violation of s.
610 316.172(1)(a) or (b), there is a rebuttable presumption that a
611 school bus infraction detection system complies with and meets
612 all required specifications.
613 (20) If a school district, as established in s. 4, Art. IX
614 of the State Constitution, has contracted with a private vendor
615 or manufacturer to install school bus infraction detection
616 systems for school buses for public schools pursuant to this
617 section, then charter schools and private schools within the
618 geographic area of that school district may enter into separate
619 contracts for the installation of school bus infraction
620 detection systems with the same vendor or manufacturer. However,
621 if the school district terminates all contracts for school bus
622 infraction detection systems with a vendor or manufacturer, any
623 contracts entered into by such charter schools or private
624 schools are immediately terminated. Only school buses that meet
625 the Florida School Bus Specifications adopted by the State Board
Page 25 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
626 of Education may use school infraction detection systems as
627 provided in this subsection.
628 Section 8. Subsection (2) of section 316.183, Florida
629 Statutes, is amended to read:
630 316.183 Unlawful speed.—
631 (2) On all streets or highways, the maximum speed limits
632 for all vehicles must be 30 miles per hour in business or
633 residence districts, and 55 miles per hour at any time at all
634 other locations. However, with respect to a residence district,
635 a county or municipality may set a lower maximum speed limit of
636 20 or 25 miles per hour on local streets and highways after an
637 investigation determines that such a limit is reasonable. It is
638 not necessary to conduct a separate investigation for each
639 residence district. The minimum speed limit on all highways that
640 comprise a part of the National System of Interstate and Defense
641 Highways and have not fewer than four lanes is 40 miles per
642 hour, except that when the posted speed limit is 70 miles per
643 hour, the minimum speed limit is 50 miles per hour.
644 Section 9. Paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of section
645 316.189, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
646 316.189 Establishment of municipal and county speed
647 zones.—
648 (2) SPEED ON COUNTY ROADS.—The maximum speed on any
649 county-maintained road is:
650 (a) In any business or residence district, 30 miles per
Page 26 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
651 hour in the daytime or nighttime; provided that with respect to
652 residence districts a county may set a lower maximum speed limit
653 of 25 miles per hour after an investigation determines that such
654 a limit is reasonable; and it shall not be necessary to conduct
655 a separate investigation in each residence district.
656
657 However, the board of county commissioners may set speed zones
658 altering such speeds, both as to maximum and minimum, after
659 investigation determines such a change is reasonable and in
660 conformity to criteria promulgated by the Department of
661 Transportation, except that no such speed zone shall permit a
662 speed of more than 60 miles per hour.
663 Section 10. Subsection (6) of section 316.1895, Florida
664 Statutes, is amended to read:
665 316.1895 Establishment of school speed zones, enforcement;
666 designation.—
667 (6) Permanent signs designating school zones and school
668 zone speed limits shall be uniform in size and color, and shall
669 have the times during which the restrictive speed limit is
670 enforced clearly designated thereon. Flashing beacons activated
671 by a time clock, or other automatic device, or manually
672 activated may be used as an alternative to posting the times
673 during which the restrictive school speed limit is enforced.
674 However, if a restricted school zone speed limit is enforced
675 through a speed detection system as provided in s. 316.1896,
Page 27 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
676 then the school zone and restricted school zone speed limit must
677 be designated using flashing beacons. Beginning July 1, 2008,
678 for any newly established school zone or any school zone in
679 which the signing has been replaced, a sign stating "Speeding
680 Fines Doubled" shall be installed within the school zone. The
681 Department of Transportation shall establish adequate standards
682 for the signs and flashing beacons.
683 Section 11. Subsections (1), (2), (3), (6), and (8),
684 paragraph (a) of subsection (15), and paragraph (a) of
685 subsection (16) of section 316.1896, Florida Statutes, are
686 amended to read:
687 316.1896 Roadways maintained as school zones; speed
688 detection system enforcement; penalties; appeal procedure;
689 privacy; reports.—
690 (1) For purposes of administering this section, a county
691 or municipality may authorize a traffic infraction enforcement
692 officer under s. 316.640 to issue uniform traffic citations for
693 violations of ss. 316.1895 and 316.183 as authorized by s.
694 316.008(9), as follows:
695 (a) For a violation of s. 316.1895 in excess of 10 miles
696 per hour over the school zone speed limit which occurs within 30
697 minutes before through 30 minutes after the start of a regularly
698 scheduled breakfast program.
699 (b) For a violation of s. 316.1895 in excess of 10 miles
700 per hour over the school zone speed limit which occurs within 30
Page 28 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
701 minutes before through 30 minutes after the start of a regularly
702 scheduled school session.
703 (c) For a violation of s. 316.183 in excess of 10 miles
704 per hour over the posted speed limit during the entirety of a
705 regularly scheduled school session.
706 (d) For a violation of s. 316.1895 in excess of 10 miles
707 per hour over the school zone speed limit which occurs within 30
708 minutes before through 30 minutes after the end of a regularly
709 scheduled school session.
710
711 Such violation must be evidenced by a speed detection system
712 described in ss. 316.008(9) and 316.0776(3). This subsection
713 does not prohibit a review of information from a speed detection
714 system by an authorized employee or agent of a county or
715 municipality before issuance of the uniform traffic citation by
716 the traffic infraction enforcement officer. This subsection does
717 not prohibit a county or municipality from issuing notices as
718 provided in subsection (2) to the registered owner of the motor
719 vehicle for a violation of s. 316.1895 or s. 316.183. The
720 restricted school zone speed limit may only be enforced through
721 the use of a speed detection system when any flashing beacon
722 used to provide notice of the restricted school zone speed limit
723 is activated. For speed detection systems installed before July
724 1, 2026, capturing the beacon status photographically, on video,
725 or by other evidence is not required for proof of the beacon
Page 29 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
726 status until January 1, 2028. An area maintained as a school
727 zone that has no beacon installed before July 1, 2026, has until
728 January 1, 2028, to place and install a beacon and, until the
729 beacon is installed, the county or municipality may provide
730 proof of the restricted school zone speed limit in force at the
731 time of violation without evidence of the beacon status.
732 (2) Within 30 days after a violation, notice must be sent
733 to the registered owner of the motor vehicle involved in the
734 violation specifying the remedies available under s. 318.14 and
735 that the violator must pay the penalty under s. 318.18(3)(d) to
736 the county or municipality, or furnish an affidavit in
737 accordance with subsection (8), within 60 30 days after the date
738 of the notice of violation in order to avoid court fees, costs,
739 and the issuance of a uniform traffic citation. The notice of
740 violation must:
741 (a) Be sent by first-class mail.
742 (b) Include a photograph or other recorded image showing
743 the license plate of the motor vehicle; the date, time, and
744 location of the violation; the maximum speed at which the motor
745 vehicle was traveling within the school zone; and the speed
746 limit within the school zone at the time of the violation.
747 (c) Include a notice that the owner has the right to
748 review, in person or remotely, the photograph or video captured
749 by the speed detection system and the evidence of the speed of
750 the motor vehicle detected by the speed detection system which
Page 30 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
751 constitute a rebuttable presumption that the motor vehicle was
752 used in violation of s. 316.1895 or s. 316.183.
753 (d) State the time when, and the place or website at
754 which, the photograph or video captured and evidence of speed
755 detected may be examined and observed.
756 (3) Notwithstanding any other law, a person who receives a
757 notice of violation under this section may request a hearing
758 within 60 30 days after the notice of violation or may pay the
759 penalty pursuant to the notice of violation, but a payment or
760 fee may not be required before the hearing requested by the
761 person. The notice of violation must be accompanied by, or
762 direct the person to a website that provides, information on the
763 person's right to request a hearing and on all costs related
764 thereto and a form used for requesting a hearing. As used in
765 this subsection, the term "person" includes a natural person,
766 the registered owner or co-owner of a motor vehicle, or the
767 person identified in an affidavit as having actual care,
768 custody, or control of the motor vehicle at the time of the
769 violation.
770 (6) A uniform traffic citation must be issued by mailing
771 the uniform traffic citation by certified mail to the address of
772 the registered owner of the motor vehicle involved in the
773 violation if payment has not been made within 60 30 days after
774 notification under subsection (2), if the registered owner has
775 not requested a hearing as authorized under subsection (3), and
Page 31 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
776 if the registered owner has not submitted an affidavit in
777 accordance with subsection (8).
778 (a) Delivery of the uniform traffic citation constitutes
779 notification of a violation under this subsection. If the
780 registered owner or co-owner of the motor vehicle; the person
781 identified as having care, custody, or control of the motor
782 vehicle at the time of the violation; or a duly authorized
783 representative of the owner, co-owner, or identified person
784 initiates a proceeding to challenge the citation pursuant to
785 this section, such person waives any challenge or dispute as to
786 the delivery of the uniform traffic citation.
787 (b) In the case of joint ownership of a motor vehicle, the
788 uniform traffic citation must be mailed to the first name
789 appearing on the motor vehicle registration, unless the first
790 name appearing on the registration is a business organization,
791 in which case the second name appearing on the registration may
792 be used.
793 (c) The uniform traffic citation mailed to the registered
794 owner of the motor vehicle involved in the infraction must be
795 accompanied by the information described in paragraphs (2)(b)-
796 (d).
797 (8) To establish such facts under subsection (7), the
798 registered owner of the motor vehicle must, within 60 30 days
799 after the date of issuance of the notice of violation or the
800 uniform traffic citation, furnish to the appropriate
Page 32 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
801 governmental entity an affidavit setting forth information
802 supporting an exception under subsection (7).
803 (a) An affidavit supporting the exception under paragraph
804 (7)(a) must include the name, address, date of birth, and, if
805 known, the driver license number of the person who leased,
806 rented, or otherwise had care, custody, or control of the motor
807 vehicle at the time of the alleged violation. If the motor
808 vehicle was stolen at the time of the alleged violation, the
809 affidavit must include the police report indicating that the
810 motor vehicle was stolen.
811 (b) If a uniform traffic citation for a violation of s.
812 316.1895 or s. 316.183 was issued at the location of the
813 violation by a law enforcement officer, the affidavit must
814 include the serial number of the uniform traffic citation.
815 (c) If the motor vehicle's owner to whom a notice of
816 violation or a uniform traffic citation has been issued is
817 deceased, the affidavit must include a certified copy of the
818 owner's death certificate showing that the date of death
819 occurred on or before the date of the alleged violation and one
820 of the following:
821 1. A bill of sale or other document showing that the
822 deceased owner's motor vehicle was sold or transferred after his
823 or her death but on or before the date of the alleged violation.
824 2. Documented proof that the registered license plate
825 belonging to the deceased owner's motor vehicle was returned to
Page 33 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
826 the department or any branch office or authorized agent of the
827 department after his or her death but on or before the date of
828 the alleged violation.
829 3. A copy of the police report showing that the deceased
830 owner's registered license plate or motor vehicle was stolen
831 after his or her death but on or before the date of the alleged
832 violation.
833
834 Upon receipt of the affidavit and documentation required under
835 paragraphs (b) and (c), or 60 30 days after the date of issuance
836 of a notice of violation sent to a person identified as having
837 care, custody, or control of the motor vehicle at the time of
838 the violation under paragraph (a), the county or municipality
839 must dismiss the notice or citation and provide proof of such
840 dismissal to the person who submitted the affidavit. If, within
841 30 days after the date of a notice of violation sent to a person
842 under subsection (9), the county or municipality receives an
843 affidavit under subsection (10) from the person sent a notice of
844 violation affirming that the person did not have care, custody,
845 or control of the motor vehicle at the time of the violation,
846 the county or municipality must notify the registered owner that
847 the notice or citation will not be dismissed due to failure to
848 establish that another person had care, custody, or control of
849 the motor vehicle at the time of the violation.
Page 34 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
850 (15)(a) A speed detection system in a school zone may not
851 be used for remote surveillance. The collection of evidence by a
852 speed detection system to enforce violations of ss. 316.1895 and
853 316.183, or user-controlled pan or tilt adjustments of speed
854 detection system components, do not constitute remote
855 surveillance. Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
856 recorded video or photographs collected as part of a speed
857 detection system in a school zone may only be used to document
858 violations of ss. 316.1895 and 316.183 and for purposes of
859 determining criminal or civil liability for incidents captured
860 by the speed detection system incidental to the permissible use
861 of the speed detection system.
862 (16)(a) Each county or municipality that operates one or
863 more speed detection systems shall must submit a report by
864 October 1, 2024, and annually thereafter, to the department
865 which identifies the public safety objectives used to identify a
866 school zone for enforcement under this section, reports
867 compliance with s. 316.0776(3)(c), and details the results of
868 the speed detection system in the school zone during the
869 preceding state fiscal year and the procedures for enforcement.
870 The information from counties and municipalities must be
871 submitted in a form and manner determined by the department,
872 which the department must make available to the counties and
873 municipalities by August 1, 2023, and the department may require
874 data components to be submitted quarterly. The report must
Page 35 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
875 include at least the following:
876 1. Information related to the location of each speed
877 detection system, including the geocoordinates of the school
878 zone, the directional approach of the speed detection system,
879 the school name, the school level, the times the speed detection
880 system was active, the restricted school zone speed limit
881 enforced pursuant to s. 316.1895(5), the posted speed limit
882 enforced at times other than those authorized by s. 316.1895(5),
883 the date the systems were activated to enforce violations of ss.
884 316.1895 and 316.183, and, if applicable, the date the systems
885 were deactivated.
886 2. The number of notices of violation issued, the number,
887 if any, that were issued outside of the enforcement periods
888 authorized in subsection (1), the number that were contested,
889 the number that were upheld, the number that were dismissed, the
890 number that were issued as uniform traffic citations, and the
891 number that were paid.
892 3. Any other statistical data and information related to
893 the procedures for enforcement which is required by the
894 department to complete the report required under paragraph (c).
895 Section 12. Subsection (3) of section 316.1906, Florida
896 Statutes, is amended to read:
897 316.1906 Radar speed-measuring devices; speed detection
898 systems; evidence, admissibility.—
Page 36 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
899 (3) A speed detection system is exempt from the design
900 requirements for radar or LiDAR units established by the
901 department, and the radar or LiDAR units used in the speed
902 detection system are not required to be on any approved list of
903 the department. A speed detection system must have the ability
904 to perform self-tests as to its detection accuracy. The system
905 must perform a self-test at least once every 30 days. The law
906 enforcement agency, or an agent acting on behalf of the law
907 enforcement agency, operating a speed detection system must
908 maintain a log of the results of the system's self-tests. The
909 law enforcement agency, or an agent acting on behalf of the law
910 enforcement agency, operating a speed detection system must also
911 perform an independent calibration test on the speed detection
912 system at least once every 12 months. The self-test logs, as
913 well as the results of the annual calibration test, are
914 admissible in any court proceeding for a uniform traffic
915 citation issued for a violation of s. 316.1895 or s. 316.183
916 enforced pursuant to s. 316.1896. Notwithstanding subsection
917 (2), evidence of the speed of a motor vehicle detected by a
918 speed detection system compliant with this subsection and the
919 determination by a traffic enforcement officer that a motor
920 vehicle is operating in excess of the applicable speed limit is
921 admissible in any proceeding with respect to an alleged
922 violation of law regulating the speed of motor vehicles in
923 school zones.
Page 37 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
924 Section 13. Subsection (5) is added to section 316.1955,
925 Florida Statutes, to read:
926 316.1955 Enforcement of parking requirements for persons
927 who have disabilities.—
928 (5)(a) A vehicle that displays a valid disabled parking
929 permit or a license plate issued under s. 316.1958 or s.
930 320.0848 and that is equipped with permanently installed
931 mobility access equipment, including, but not limited to,
932 wheelchair ramps or lifts, may occupy more than one parking
933 space when reasonably necessary to deploy such equipment safely,
934 provided that no designated accessible parking spaces are
935 available or sufficient to accommodate the vehicle's equipment.
936 (b) A vehicle described in paragraph (a) may not be cited,
937 penalized, or towed solely because the vehicle occupies more
938 than one parking space or exceeds standard parking dimensions,
939 if:
940 1. The vehicle displays a valid disabled parking permit or
941 plate.
942 2. The vehicle does not block vehicular traffic lanes,
943 emergency access routes, fire lanes, or pedestrian access paths.
944 3. The vehicle does not create a clear and immediate
945 safety hazard.
946 (c) Before towing a vehicle displaying a valid disabled
947 parking permit or plate, a public or private property owner or
948 towing operator must make reasonable efforts to determine
Page 38 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
949 whether the vehicle qualifies for the protections of this
950 subsection, unless the vehicle presents an immediate threat to
951 public safety.
952 (d) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to
953 permit parking in:
954 1. Fire lanes;
955 2. Emergency vehicle access areas;
956 3. Clearly posted no-parking zones; or
957 4. Any location where the vehicle poses an immediate risk
958 to public safety.
959 Section 14. Subsection (2) of section 316.20655, Florida
960 Statutes, is amended to read:
961 316.20655 Electric bicycle regulations.—
962 (2) An electric bicycle as defined in s. 316.003 or an
963 operator of an electric bicycle is not subject to the provisions
964 of law relating to financial responsibility, driver or motor
965 vehicle licenses, vehicle registration, title certificates, off-
966 highway motorcycles, or off-highway vehicles.
967 Section 15. Subsections (5) through (9) of section
968 316.212, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (6)
969 through (10), respectively, paragraph (b) of present subsection
970 (8) and present subsection (9) are amended, and a new subsection
971 (5) is added to that section, to read:
Page 39 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
972 316.212 Operation of golf carts on certain roadways.—The
973 operation of a golf cart upon the public roads or streets of
974 this state is prohibited except as provided herein:
975 (5) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a
976 golf cart may be operated for the purpose of crossing a street
977 or highway at a signalized intersection, provided that:
978 (a) The intersection is located wholly within the
979 boundaries of a single local governmental entity.
980 (b) The local governmental entity has designated, for the
981 operation of golf carts, the street or road located on both
982 sides of the intersection with the street or highway.
983 (c) The local governmental entity has approved the
984 operation of golf carts for the purpose of crossing at the
985 intersection and has posted appropriate signs at the
986 intersection to indicate that such operation is authorized.
987 (9)(8) A local governmental entity may enact an ordinance
988 relating to:
989 (b) Golf cart operation on sidewalks adjacent to specific
990 segments of municipal streets, county roads, or state highways
991 within the jurisdictional territory of the local governmental
992 entity if:
993 1. The local governmental entity determines, after
994 considering the condition and current use of the sidewalks, the
995 character of the surrounding community, and the locations of
996 authorized golf cart crossings, that golf carts, bicycles, and
Page 40 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
997 pedestrians may safely share the sidewalk;
998 2. The local governmental entity consults with the
999 Department of Transportation before adopting the ordinance;
1000 3. The ordinance restricts golf carts to a maximum speed
1001 of 15 miles per hour and permits such use on sidewalks adjacent
1002 to state highways only if the sidewalks are at least 8 feet
1003 wide;
1004 4. The ordinance requires the golf carts to meet the
1005 equipment requirements in subsection (7) (6). However, the
1006 ordinance may require additional equipment, including horns or
1007 other warning devices required by s. 316.271; and
1008 5. The local governmental entity posts appropriate signs
1009 or otherwise informs residents that the ordinance exists and
1010 applies to such sidewalks.
1011 (10)(9) A violation of this section is a noncriminal
1012 traffic infraction, punishable pursuant to chapter 318 as a
1013 moving violation for infractions of subsections (1)-(6) (1)-(5)
1014 or a local ordinance corresponding thereto and enacted pursuant
1015 to subsection (9) (8), or punishable pursuant to chapter 318 as
1016 a nonmoving violation for infractions of subsection (7) (6),
1017 subsection (8) (7), or a local ordinance corresponding thereto
1018 and enacted pursuant to subsection (9) (8).
1019 Section 16. Sections 316.272 and 316.293, Florida
1020 Statutes, are repealed.
1021 Section 17. Subsections (2) through (5) of section
Page 41 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
1022 316.3045, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (3)
1023 through (6), respectively, and a new subsection (2) is added to
1024 that section to read:
1025 316.3045 Operation of radios or other mechanical or
1026 electronic soundmaking devices or instruments in vehicles;
1027 exhaust systems; prevention of noise; exemptions.—
1028 (2) Every motor vehicle that is required by federal law or
1029 regulation to be equipped with an exhaust system shall at all
1030 times be equipped with and maintain an exhaust system in good
1031 working order including muffler, manifold pipe, and tailpiping
1032 to prevent excessive or unusual noise. It is a violation of this
1033 subsection to intentionally increase the revolutions per minute
1034 or unreasonably accelerate in a manner that would produce
1035 excessive or unusual noise. This subsection does not apply to a
1036 motorcycle or moped that does not exceed United States
1037 Environmental Protection Agency noise emissions standards in 40
1038 C.F.R. s. 205.152.
1039 Section 18. Paragraph (c) of subsection (3) of section
1040 316.650, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1041 316.650 Traffic citations.—
1042 (3)
1043 (c) If a traffic citation is issued under s. 316.0083 or
1044 s. 316.1896, the traffic infraction enforcement officer, or if
1045 the citation is issued under s. 316.173 the sworn law
1046 enforcement officer, must shall provide by electronic
Page 42 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
1047 transmission a replica of the traffic citation data to the court
1048 having jurisdiction over the alleged offense or its traffic
1049 violations bureau within 5 business days after the date of
1050 issuance of the traffic citation to the violator. If a hearing
1051 is requested, the traffic infraction enforcement officer or
1052 sworn law enforcement officer, as applicable, must shall provide
1053 a replica of the traffic notice of violation data to the clerk
1054 to for the local hearing officer having jurisdiction over the
1055 alleged offense within 14 days.
1056 Section 19. Subsection (3) of section 318.15, Florida
1057 Statutes, is amended to read:
1058 318.15 Failure to comply with civil penalty or to appear;
1059 penalty.—
1060 (3) The clerk of the court or the clerk to the local
1061 hearing officer shall notify the department of persons who were
1062 mailed a notice of violation of s. 316.074(1) or s.
1063 316.075(1)(c)1. pursuant to s. 316.0083, s. 316.172(1)(a) or (b)
1064 pursuant to s. 316.173, or s. 316.183 or s. 316.1895(10)
1065 pursuant to s. 316.1896 and who failed to enter into, or comply
1066 with the terms of, a penalty payment plan, or order with the
1067 clerk to the local hearing officer or failed to appear at a
1068 scheduled hearing within 10 days after such failure, and shall
1069 reference the person's driver license number, or in the case of
1070 a business entity, vehicle registration number.
1071 (a) Upon receipt of such notice, the department, or
Page 43 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
1072 authorized agent thereof, may not issue a license plate or
1073 revalidation sticker for any motor vehicle owned or co-owned by
1074 that person pursuant to s. 320.03(8) until the amounts assessed
1075 have been fully paid.
1076 (b) After the issuance of the person's license plate or
1077 revalidation sticker is withheld pursuant to paragraph (a), the
1078 person may challenge the withholding of the license plate or
1079 revalidation sticker only on the basis that the outstanding
1080 fines and civil penalties have been paid pursuant to s.
1081 320.03(8).
1082 Section 20. Paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) of subsection (5)
1083 and subsection (23) of section 318.18, Florida Statutes, are
1084 amended to read:
1085 318.18 Amount of penalties.—The penalties required for a
1086 noncriminal disposition pursuant to s. 318.14 or a criminal
1087 offense listed in s. 318.17 are as follows:
1088 (5)(a)1. Except as provided in subparagraph 2., $200 for a
1089 violation of s. 316.172(1)(a), failure to stop for a school bus.
1090 If, at a hearing, the alleged offender is found to have
1091 committed this offense, the court shall impose a minimum civil
1092 penalty of $200. In addition to this penalty, for a second or
1093 subsequent offense within a period of 5 years, the department
1094 shall suspend the driver license of the person for not less than
1095 180 days and not more than 1 year.
Page 44 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
1096 2. If a violation of s. 316.172(1)(a) is enforced by a
1097 school bus infraction detection system pursuant to s. 316.173,
1098 the penalty of $200 shall be imposed. If, at an administrative
1099 hearing contesting a notice of violation or uniform traffic
1100 citation, the alleged offender is found to have committed this
1101 offense, a minimum civil penalty of $200 shall be imposed.
1102 Notwithstanding any other provision of law except s. 28.37(6),
1103 the civil penalties assessed under this subparagraph resulting
1104 from a notice of violation or uniform traffic citation shall be
1105 remitted to the school district at least monthly and used
1106 pursuant to s. 316.173(8).
1107 (b)1. Except as provided in subparagraph 2., $400 for a
1108 violation of s. 316.172(1)(b), passing a school bus on the side
1109 that children enter and exit when the school bus displays a stop
1110 signal. If, at a hearing, the alleged offender is found to have
1111 committed this offense, the court shall impose a minimum civil
1112 penalty of $400.
1113 2. If a violation of s. 316.172(1)(b) is enforced by a
1114 school bus infraction detection system pursuant to s. 316.173,
1115 the penalty under this subparagraph is a minimum of $200. If, at
1116 a hearing contesting a notice of violation or uniform traffic
1117 citation, the alleged offender is found to have committed this
1118 offense, the court shall impose a minimum civil penalty of $200.
1119 Notwithstanding any other provision of law except s. 28.37(6),
1120 the civil penalties assessed under this subparagraph resulting
Page 45 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
1121 from notice of violation or uniform traffic citation shall be
1122 remitted to the school district at least monthly and used
1123 pursuant to s. 316.173(8).
1124 3. In addition to this penalty, for a second or subsequent
1125 offense within a period of 5 years, the department shall suspend
1126 the driver license of the person for not less than 360 days and
1127 not more than 2 years.
1128 (c)1. In addition to the penalty under subparagraph (a)2.
1129 or subparagraph (b)2., if, at an administrative hearing
1130 contesting a notice of violation, the alleged offender is found
1131 to have committed this offense, costs shall be imposed, not to
1132 exceed those established in s. 316.0083(5)(e), to be paid by the
1133 petitioner and to be used by the county for the operational
1134 costs related to the hearing or the school district for
1135 technology and operational costs relating to the hearing as well
1136 as school transportation safety-related initiatives.
1137 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if a county's local
1138 hearing officer administers the administrative hearing process
1139 for a contested notice of violation, the costs imposed under
1140 this subparagraph resulting from notice of violation shall be
1141 remitted to the county at least monthly.
1142 2. In addition to the penalty under paragraph (a) or
1143 paragraph (b), $65 for a violation of s. 316.172(1)(a) or (b).
1144 If the alleged offender is found to have committed the offense,
1145 the court shall impose the civil penalty under paragraph (a) or
Page 46 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
1146 paragraph (b) plus an additional $65. The additional $65
1147 collected under this subparagraph shall be remitted to the
1148 Department of Revenue for deposit into the Emergency Medical
1149 Services Trust Fund of the Department of Health to be used as
1150 provided in s. 395.4036. If a violation of s. 316.172(1)(a) or
1151 (b) is enforced by a school bus infraction detection system
1152 pursuant to s. 316.173, an the additional civil penalty amount
1153 imposed on a notice of violation, on a uniform traffic citation,
1154 or by the court under this paragraph must be $25, in lieu of the
1155 additional $65, and, notwithstanding any other provision of law,
1156 the additional civil penalties and additional costs must be
1157 remitted to the participating school district at least monthly
1158 and used pursuant to s. 316.173(8).
1159 (23) In addition to the penalty prescribed under s.
1160 316.0083, s. 316.173, s. 316.183, 316.1895, or s. 316.1896 for
1161 violations enforced under those sections s. 316.0083 which are
1162 upheld by the local hearing officer, the local hearing officer
1163 may also order the payment of county, or municipal, or school
1164 district costs, not to exceed $250.
1165 Section 21. Section 319.1401, Florida Statutes, is created
1166 to read:
1167 319.1401 Titling and registering golf carts converted to
1168 low-speed vehicles.—A golf cart converted to a low-speed vehicle
1169 may be titled and registered for operation on certain roads. A
1170 motor vehicle dealer, a motor vehicle repair shop, or the
Page 47 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
1171 department shall affirm in writing that the low-speed vehicle
1172 complies with the requirements of chapter 316, and the vehicle
1173 shall be assigned an identification number by the department.
1174 The identification number shall be unique to the low-speed
1175 vehicle and used for the issuance of a title and registration
1176 for the vehicle.
1177 Section 22. Subsection (12) of section 320.02, Florida
1178 Statutes, is amended to read:
1179 320.02 Registration required; application for
1180 registration; forms.—
1181 (12) The department is authorized to withhold registration
1182 or reregistration of any motor vehicle if the owner, or one of
1183 the co-owners of the vehicle:,
1184 (a) Has a driver license which is under suspension for the
1185 failure to remit payment of any fines levied in this state
1186 pursuant to chapter 318 or chapter 322; or
1187 (b) Received a traffic citation for a violation of s.
1188 316.074(1) or s. 316.075(1)(c)1. as enforced by s. 316.0083, s.
1189 316.172(1)(a) or (b) as enforced by s. 316.173, or s. 316.183 or
1190 s. 316.1895(10) as enforced by s. 316.1896 and did not request a
1191 hearing, submit an affidavit claiming an exception, or pay the
1192 traffic citation.
1193 Section 23. Subsection (5) is added to section 320.262,
1194 Florida Statutes, to read:
1195 320.262 License plate obscuring device prohibited;
Page 48 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
1196 penalties.—
1197 (5) The use of a license plate frame or decorative border
1198 device is not an offense under this section, provided that the
1199 device does not obscure the visibility of the following:
1200 (a) The alphanumeric designation or license plate number.
1201 (b) The registration decal or validation sticker located
1202 in the upper right corner.
1203 Section 24. Section 322.032, Florida Statutes, is amended
1204 to read:
1205 322.032 Digital proof of driver license or identification
1206 card.—
1207 (1) As used in this section, the term:
1208 (a) "Credentialholder" means a person who is issued a
1209 digital driver license.
1210 (b)(a) "Digital proof of driver license" means an
1211 electronic credential viewable on an electronic credentialing
1212 system where the credential conveys identity and driving
1213 privilege information and is in compliance with the ISO/IEC
1214 18013-5 and 18013-7 standard.
1215 (b) "Digital proof of identification card" means an
1216 electronic credential viewable on an electronic credentialing
1217 system.
1218 (c) "Electronic credentialing system" means a digital
1219 process that includes a method for provisioning electronic
1220 credentials of a driver license, requesting and transmitting
Page 49 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
1221 identity data contained on electronic credentials, and
1222 performing tasks to maintain the system computer system accessed
1223 using a computer, a cellular telephone, or any other personal
1224 device which queries the department's driver license and
1225 identification card records, displays or transmits digital
1226 proofs of driver licenses and identification cards, and verifies
1227 the authenticity of those electronic credentials.
1228 (d) "Verifying" means the process of obtaining and
1229 authenticating data from an electronic credential via secure
1230 encrypted communication.
1231 (d) "Limited profile" means an electronic credential
1232 containing some, but not all, of the information displayed on a
1233 printed driver license or identification card.
1234 (e) "Scanning" means obtaining data from a digital proof
1235 of driver license or identification card in an electronic
1236 format.
1237 (2)(a) The department must:
1238 1. shall Establish a secure and uniform system for issuing
1239 an optional digital proof of driver license or identification
1240 card.
1241 2. Ensure that data is not reused, repurposed, shared, or
1242 transmitted beyond the initial purpose without the explicit
1243 consent of the credentialholder.
1244 3. Securely delete data or render data irreversibly
1245 anonymized immediately upon fulfillment of the stated purpose
Page 50 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
1246 unless a longer retention period is required by law and narrowly
1247 tailored to that legal necessity.
1248 (b) The department may not:
1249 1. Track where a credential user uses a digital driver
1250 license.
1251 2. Share, store, or sell information related to a digital
1252 driver license, unless required by law.
1253 3. Retain any data related to a digital driver license,
1254 unless required by law.
1255 (c) The department may:
1256 1. Contract with one or more private entities to develop
1257 an electronic credentialing system.
1258 2. Use a telephone number submitted by a licensee in
1259 connection with a digital driver license only for purposes of
1260 communication regarding the digital driver license or the motor
1261 vehicle records, as defined in s. 119.0712(2)(a), of the
1262 licensee.
1263 3. Enter into contracts with one or more private entities
1264 which authorize data verification through an electronic
1265 credentialing system that queries the department's driver
1266 license records, displays or transmits digital driver licenses,
1267 or verifies the authenticity of such electronic credentials.
1268 4. Adopt rules to securely manage digital driver licenses
1269 (b) The electronic credentialing system may not retain
1270 Internet protocol addresses, geolocation data, or other
Page 51 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
1271 information that describes the location, computer, computer
1272 system, or computer network from which a customer accesses the
1273 system.
1274 (3)(a) Digital driver licenses must:
1275 1. Require the explicit consent of the credentialholder
1276 before adding a digital driver license or sharing electronic
1277 credential attributes.
1278 2. Be controlled by the credentialholder, who may choose
1279 to disclose only the minimum information necessary for a
1280 transaction.
1281 3. Be issued as tamper-evident, cryptographically
1282 verifiable statements capable of being selectively disclosed.
1283 4. Contain clear metadata specifying cryptographic
1284 material necessary for independent verification.
1285 5. Provide a credentialholder with the ability to audit
1286 verification requests.
1287 6. Preserve the anonymity and prevent linkability of
1288 transactions.
1289 7. Adhere to data minimization principles, including
1290 disclosing only the minimum electronic credential attributes
1291 strictly necessary to fulfill the stated purpose of verification
1292 that is explicitly communicated to the credentialholder.
1293 8. Implement measures to ensure that the electronic
1294 credentials are updated as changes occur to the
1295 credentialholder's record.
Page 52 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
1296 (b) The digital driver license system may not:
1297 1. Retain Internet protocol addresses, geolocation data,
1298 or other information that describes the location, computer,
1299 computer system, or computer network from which a customer
1300 accesses the system.
1301 2. Require communication with the department, other than
1302 updates to the credentialholder's record.
1303 (4) Digital driver license verifiers must:
1304 (a) Perform cryptographic validation of digital driver
1305 license authenticity, integrity, and issuer attribution without
1306 requiring online access to external systems, the department's
1307 systems, or any state system.
1308 (b) Retain only temporary user-authorized verification
1309 data that is strictly necessary for the transaction.
1310 (c) Communicate to the credentialholder the data that was
1311 temporarily retained.
1312 (d) Create written strict data minimization principles
1313 that must be provided to a credentialholder upon request.
1314 (3)(a) The digital proof of driver license or
1315 identification card established by the department or by an
1316 entity contracted by the department must be in such a format as
1317 to allow verification of the authenticity of the digital proof
1318 of driver license or identification card. The department may
1319 adopt rules to ensure valid authentication of digital driver
1320 licenses and identification cards.
Page 53 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
1321 (b)1. Notwithstanding ss. 322.14-322.142, and any other
1322 law prescribing the design for, or information required to be
1323 displayed on, a driver license, a digital proof of driver
1324 license may comprise a limited profile that includes only
1325 information necessary to conduct a specific transaction on the
1326 electronic credentialing system.
1327 2. Notwithstanding ss. 322.051 and 322.141, and any other
1328 law prescribing the design for, or information required to be
1329 displayed on, an identification card, a digital proof of
1330 identification card may comprise a limited profile that includes
1331 only information necessary to conduct a specific transaction on
1332 the electronic credentialing system.
1333 (5)(4) A person may not be issued a digital proof of
1334 driver license or identification card until he or she satisfies
1335 all requirements of this chapter for issuance of the respective
1336 driver license or identification card and has been issued a
1337 printed driver license or identification card. The electronic
1338 credentialing system must, upon each presentation of a digital
1339 driver license or identification card, display or transmit
1340 current records for the driver license or identification card.
1341 If a licensee's driving privilege is suspended, revoked, or
1342 disqualified, or if his or her driver license is otherwise
1343 canceled or expired, a digital proof of driver license may not
1344 be issued; however, a digital proof of identification card may
Page 54 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
1345 be issued if the licensee is otherwise eligible for an
1346 identification card under s. 322.051.
1347 (5) The department may use a telephone number submitted by
1348 a licensee or cardholder in connection with a digital driver
1349 license or identification card only for purposes of
1350 communication regarding the digital proof of driver license or
1351 identification card or the motor vehicle records, as defined in
1352 s. 119.0712(2)(a), of the licensee or cardholder.
1353 (6) The department may enter into contracts with one or
1354 more private entities which authorize online data calls or
1355 offline data verification through the electronic credentialing
1356 system that queries the department's driver license and
1357 identification card records, displays or transmits digital
1358 proofs of driver licenses or identification cards, or verifies
1359 the authenticity of such electronic credentials.
1360 (6)(7)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b), a private
1361 entity that verifies scans a digital proof of driver license or
1362 identification card may not store, sell, or share personal
1363 information collected from such verifying scanning of the
1364 digital proof of driver license or identification card.
1365 (b) An individual may consent to allow a private entity to
1366 collect and store personal information obtained by verifying
1367 scanning his or her digital proof of driver license or
1368 identification card. However, the individual must be informed
1369 what information is collected and the purpose or purposes for
Page 55 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
1370 which the information will be used. If a credentialholder the
1371 individual does not want the private entity to verify scan his
1372 or her digital proof of the individual's driver license or
1373 identification card, the private entity may manually collect
1374 personal information from the individual.
1375 (c) A private entity that violates this subsection is
1376 subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $5,000 per occurrence.
1377 (d) This subsection does not apply to a financial
1378 institution as defined in s. 655.005(1)(i).
1379 (7)(8) A person who:
1380 (a) Manufactures a false digital proof of driver license
1381 or identification card commits a felony of the third degree,
1382 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
1383 (b) Possesses a false digital proof of driver license or
1384 identification card commits a misdemeanor of the second degree,
1385 punishable as provided in s. 775.082.
1386 Section 25. Paragraphs (c) through (n) of subsection (4)
1387 of section 322.142, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as
1388 paragraphs (d) through (o), respectively, a new paragraph (c) is
1389 added to that subsection, and subsections (5), (6), and (7) are
1390 added to that section, to read:
1391 322.142 Color photographic or digital imaged licenses.—
1392 (4) The department may maintain a film negative or print
1393 file. The department shall maintain a record of the digital
1394 image and signature of the licensees, together with other data
Page 56 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
1395 required by the department for identification and retrieval.
1396 Reproductions from the file or digital record are exempt from
1397 the provisions of s. 119.07(1) and may be made and issued only:
1398 (c) For identity verification by a state agency pursuant
1399 to an interagency agreement, subject to the licensee's consent.
1400 (5) An identify verification service provider may use
1401 department data for the department's or another agency's
1402 internal identity verification purposes in a manner consistent
1403 with this section only if such data remains in the possession of
1404 the department.
1405 (6) An identity verification service provider may not
1406 sell, share, or retain any information outside of the purposes
1407 of this section.
1408 (7) The department may not allow the use of digital imaged
1409 licenses for a private entity's business purposes.
1410 Section 26. Paragraph (d) is added to subsection (11) of
1411 section 337.11, Florida Statutes, to read:
1412 337.11 Contracting authority of department; bids;
1413 emergency repairs, supplemental agreements, and change orders;
1414 combined design and construction contracts; progress payments;
1415 records; requirements of vehicle registration.—
1416 (11)
1417 (d)1. Without creating any enforceable third-party
1418 beneficiary rights, the department may make direct payments to
1419 first-tier subcontractors. The department shall adopt by rule
Page 57 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
1420 procedures to implement this subsection. Such procedures shall
1421 establish the conditions under which such payments may be made
1422 and shall consider, at a minimum, whether:
1423 a. The contractor has not requested payment from the
1424 department for at least 6 months.
1425 b. There is a binding, written subcontract between the
1426 contractor and the subcontractor, and the department is in
1427 possession of a complete copy of the subcontract.
1428 c. The subcontractor has performed work that is unpaid by
1429 the contractor, and the department has sufficient documentation
1430 of such unpaid work.
1431 d. There is no legitimate dispute between the contractor
1432 and the subcontractor.
1433 e. The department has provided written notice to the
1434 payment and performance bond surety at least 30 days before
1435 releasing any payment under this paragraph, and the surety has
1436 not objected in writing within that 30-day period based on a
1437 documented dispute or claim regarding the work or payment.
1438 2. Any amounts paid by the department under this paragraph
1439 shall be deducted from amounts otherwise due the contractor.
1440 Section 27. Subsection (6) of section 337.18, Florida
1441 Statutes, is renumbered as subsection (7), and a new subsection
1442 (6) is added to that section to read:
1443 337.18 Surety bonds for construction or maintenance
1444 contracts; requirement with respect to contract award; bond
Page 58 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
1445 requirements; defaults; damage assessments.—
1446 (6) If the department and the surety enter into a takeover
1447 agreement, the agreement shall set forth procedures regarding
1448 the surety's certification of disbursement of payment to
1449 subcontractors.
1450 Section 28. Paragraph (j) is added to subsection (6) of
1451 section 339.175, Florida Statutes, to read:
1452 339.175 Metropolitan planning organization.—
1453 (6) POWERS, DUTIES, AND RESPONSIBILITIES.—The powers,
1454 privileges, and authority of an M.P.O. are those specified in
1455 this section or incorporated in an interlocal agreement
1456 authorized under s. 163.01. Each M.P.O. shall perform all acts
1457 required by federal or state laws or rules, now and subsequently
1458 applicable, which are necessary to qualify for federal aid. It
1459 is the intent of this section that each M.P.O. be involved in
1460 the planning and programming of transportation facilities,
1461 including, but not limited to, airports, intercity and high-
1462 speed rail lines, seaports, and intermodal facilities, to the
1463 extent permitted by state or federal law. An M.P.O. may not
1464 perform project production or delivery for capital improvement
1465 projects on the State Highway System.
1466 (j) By December 31, 2026, the M.P.O.'s serving Charlotte,
1467 Collier, and Lee Counties must submit to the Governor, the
1468 President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of
1469 Representatives a feasibility report exploring the benefits,
Page 59 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
1470 costs, and process of consolidation into a single M.P.O. serving
1471 the contiguous urbanized area, the goal of which is to:
1472 1. Coordinate transportation projects deemed to be
1473 regionally significant.
1474 2. Review the impact of regionally significant land use
1475 decisions on the region.
1476 3. Review all proposed regionally significant
1477 transportation projects in the transportation improvement
1478 programs.
1479 Section 29. Subsection (23) is added to section 775.15,
1480 Florida Statutes, to read:
1481 775.15 Time limitations; general time limitations;
1482 exceptions.—
1483 (23) For a traffic citation enforced pursuant to s.
1484 316.0083, s. 316.173, s. 316.183, or s. 316.1896, the 1-year
1485 period of limitation for a noncriminal violation pursuant to
1486 paragraph (2)(d) is extended for 1 year upon receipt of an
1487 affidavit indicating that the motor vehicle was in the care,
1488 custody, or control of another person at the time of the
1489 violation, as authorized in s. 316.0083, s. 316.173, s. 316.183,
1490 or s. 316.1896, respectively.
1491 Section 30. Subsection (1) of section 316.1995, Florida
1492 Statutes, is amended to read:
1493 316.1995 Driving upon sidewalk or bicycle path.—
Page 60 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
1494 (1) Except as provided in s. 316.008, s. 316.20655, s. s.
1495 316.212(9) 316.212(8), or s. 316.2128, a person may not drive
1496 any vehicle other than by human power upon a bicycle path,
1497 sidewalk, or sidewalk area, except upon a permanent or duly
1498 authorized temporary driveway.
1499 Section 31. Subsection (1) of section 316.2125, Florida
1500 Statutes, is amended to read:
1501 316.2125 Operation of golf carts within a retirement
1502 community.—
1503 (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of s. 316.212, the
1504 reasonable operation of a golf cart, equipped and operated as
1505 provided in s. 316.212(6), (7), and (8) s. 316.212 (5), (6), and
1506 (7), within any self-contained retirement community is
1507 authorized permitted unless prohibited under subsection (2).
1508 Section 32. Paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (1) and
1509 paragraph (c) of subsection (3) of section 316.2126, Florida
1510 Statutes, are amended to read:
1511 316.2126 Authorized use of golf carts, low-speed vehicles,
1512 and utility vehicles.—
1513 (1) In addition to the powers granted by ss. 316.212 and
1514 316.2125, municipalities are authorized to use golf carts and
1515 utility vehicles, as defined in s. 320.01, upon any state,
1516 county, or municipal roads located within the corporate limits
1517 of such municipalities, subject to the following conditions:
Page 61 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
1518 (a) Golf carts and utility vehicles must comply with the
1519 operational and safety requirements in ss. 316.212 and 316.2125,
1520 and with any more restrictive ordinances enacted by the local
1521 governmental entity pursuant to s. 316.212(9) s. 316.212(8), and
1522 shall be operated only by municipal employees for municipal
1523 purposes, including, but not limited to, police patrol, traffic
1524 enforcement, and inspection of public facilities.
1525 (b) In addition to the safety equipment required in s.
1526 316.212(7) s. 316.212(6) and any more restrictive safety
1527 equipment required by the local governmental entity pursuant to
1528 s. 316.212(9) s. 316.212(8), such golf carts and utility
1529 vehicles must be equipped with sufficient lighting and turn
1530 signal equipment.
1531 (3)
1532 (c) All vehicles specified in this subsection must be:
1533 1. Marked in a conspicuous manner with the name of the
1534 delivery service.
1535 2. Equipped with, at a minimum, the equipment required
1536 under s. 316.212(7) s. 316.212(6).
1537 3. Equipped with head lamps and tail lamps, in addition to
1538 the safety requirements in s. 316.212(7) s. 316.212(6), if
1539 operated after sunset.
1540 Section 33. Subsection (5) of section 316.2128, Florida
1541 Statutes, is amended to read:
Page 62 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
1542 316.2128 Micromobility devices, motorized scooters, and
1543 miniature motorcycles; requirements.—
1544 (5) A person who engages in the business of, serves in the
1545 capacity of, or acts as a commercial seller of miniature
1546 motorcycles in this state must prominently display at his or her
1547 place of business a notice that such vehicles are not legal to
1548 operate on public roads, may not be registered as motor
1549 vehicles, and may not be operated on sidewalks unless authorized
1550 by an ordinance enacted pursuant to s. 316.008(7)(a) or s.
1551 316.212(9) s. 316.212(8). The required notice must also appear
1552 in all forms of advertising offering miniature motorcycles for
1553 sale. The notice and a copy of this section must also be
1554 provided to a consumer before prior to the consumer's purchasing
1555 or becoming obligated to purchase a miniature motorcycle.
1556 Section 34. Subsection (6) of section 316.455, Florida
1557 Statutes, is amended to read:
1558 316.455 Other equipment.—Every motorcycle and every motor-
1559 driven cycle when operated upon a highway shall comply with the
1560 requirements and limitations of:
1561 (6) Section 316.272 on the requirement for mufflers and
1562 prevention of noise.
1563
1564 A violation of this section is a noncriminal traffic infraction,
1565 punishable as a nonmoving violation as provided in chapter 318.
1566 Section 35. Section 322.059, Florida Statutes, is amended
Page 63 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
1567 to read:
1568 322.059 Mandatory surrender of suspended driver license
1569 and registration.—A person whose driver license or registration
1570 has been suspended as provided in s. 322.058 must immediately
1571 return his or her driver license and registration to the
1572 Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles. The department
1573 shall invalidate the digital proof of driver license issued
1574 pursuant to s. 322.032 for such person. If such person fails to
1575 return his or her driver license or registration, a law
1576 enforcement agent may seize the license or registration while
1577 the driver license or registration is suspended.
1578 Section 36. Subsection (1) of section 322.15, Florida
1579 Statutes, is amended to read:
1580 322.15 License to be carried and exhibited on demand;
1581 fingerprint to be imprinted upon a citation.—
1582 (1) Every licensee shall have his or her driver license,
1583 which must be fully legible with no portion of such license
1584 faded, altered, mutilated, or defaced, in his or her immediate
1585 possession at all times when operating a motor vehicle and shall
1586 present or submit the same upon the demand of a law enforcement
1587 officer or an authorized representative of the department. A
1588 licensee may present or submit a digital proof of driver license
1589 as provided in s. 322.032 in lieu of his or her printed driver
1590 license; however, if the law enforcement officer or authorized
1591 representative of the department is unable to immediately verify
Page 64 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
1592 the digital proof of driver license, upon the demand of the law
1593 enforcement officer or authorized representative of the
1594 department, the licensee must present or submit his or her
1595 printed driver license.
1596 Section 37. Subsection (11) of section 403.061, Florida
1597 Statutes, is amended to read:
1598 403.061 Department; powers and duties.—The department
1599 shall have the power and the duty to control and prohibit
1600 pollution of air and water in accordance with the law and rules
1601 adopted and promulgated by it and, for this purpose, to:
1602 (11) Establish ambient air quality and water quality
1603 standards for the state as a whole or for any part thereof, and
1604 also standards for the abatement of excessive and unnecessary
1605 noise. The department is authorized to establish reasonable
1606 zones of mixing for discharges into waters. For existing
1607 installations as defined by rule 62-520.200(10), Florida
1608 Administrative Code, effective July 12, 2009, zones of discharge
1609 to groundwater are authorized horizontally to a facility's or
1610 owner's property boundary and extending vertically to the base
1611 of a specifically designated aquifer or aquifers. Such zones of
1612 discharge may be modified in accordance with procedures
1613 specified in department rules. Exceedance of primary and
1614 secondary groundwater standards that occur within a zone of
1615 discharge does not create liability pursuant to this chapter or
1616 chapter 376 for site cleanup, and the exceedance of soil cleanup
Page 65 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
1617 target levels is not a basis for enforcement or site cleanup.
1618 (a) When a receiving body of water fails to meet a water
1619 quality standard for pollutants set forth in department rules, a
1620 steam electric generating plant discharge of pollutants that is
1621 existing or licensed under this chapter on July 1, 1984, may
1622 nevertheless be granted a mixing zone, provided that:
1623 1. The standard would not be met in the water body in the
1624 absence of the discharge;
1625 2. The discharge is in compliance with all applicable
1626 technology-based effluent limitations;
1627 3. The discharge does not cause a measurable increase in
1628 the degree of noncompliance with the standard at the boundary of
1629 the mixing zone; and
1630 4. The discharge otherwise complies with the mixing zone
1631 provisions specified in department rules.
1632 (b) Mixing zones for point source discharges are not
1633 permitted in Outstanding Florida Waters except for:
1634 1. Sources that have received permits from the department
1635 prior to April 1, 1982, or the date of designation, whichever is
1636 later;
1637 2. Blowdown from new power plants certified pursuant to
1638 the Florida Electrical Power Plant Siting Act;
1639 3. Discharges of water necessary for water management
1640 purposes which have been approved by the governing board of a
1641 water management district and, if required by law, by the
Page 66 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
1642 secretary; and
1643 4. The discharge of demineralization concentrate which has
1644 been determined permittable under s. 403.0882 and which meets
1645 the specific provisions of s. 403.0882(4)(a) and (b), if the
1646 proposed discharge is clearly in the public interest.
1647 (c) The department, by rule, shall establish water quality
1648 criteria for wetlands which criteria give appropriate
1649 recognition to the water quality of such wetlands in their
1650 natural state.
1651
1652 This act may not be construed to invalidate any existing
1653 department rule relating to mixing zones. The department shall
1654 cooperate with the Department of Highway Safety and Motor
1655 Vehicles in the development of regulations required by s.
1656 316.272(1).
1657
1658 The department shall implement such programs in conjunction with
1659 its other powers and duties and shall place special emphasis on
1660 reducing and eliminating contamination that presents a threat to
1661 humans, animals or plants, or to the environment.
1662 Section 38. Subsection (9) of section 403.415, Florida
1663 Statutes, is amended to read:
1664 403.415 Motor vehicle noise.—
1665 (9) OPERATING VEHICLE NOISE MEASUREMENTS.—The department
1666 shall establish, with the cooperation of the Department of
Page 67 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 543, Engrossed 1 2026
1667 Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles, measurement procedures for
1668 determining compliance of operating vehicles with the noise
1669 limits of s. 316.293(2). The department shall advise the
1670 Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles on technical
1671 aspects of motor vehicle noise enforcement regulations, assist
1672 in the training of enforcement officers, and administer a sound-
1673 level meter loan program for local enforcement agencies.
1674 Section 39. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
1675 made by this act to section 318.18, Florida Statutes, in a
1676 reference thereto, section 318.121, Florida Statutes, is
1677 reenacted to read:
1678 318.121 Preemption of additional fees, fines, surcharges,
1679 and costs.—Notwithstanding any general or special law, or
1680 municipal or county ordinance, additional fees, fines,
1681 surcharges, or costs other than the court costs and surcharges
1682 assessed under s. 318.18(12), (14), (19), (20), and (23) may not
1683 be added to the civil traffic penalties assessed under this
1684 chapter.
1685 Section 40. Except as otherwise expressly provided in this
1686 act and except for this section, which shall take effect upon
1687 this act becoming a law, this act shall take effect July 1,
1688 2026.
Page 68 of 68
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb543 -04-e1